Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.065

Penalties—Hearing (as amended by 1989 c 175).

((All orders of the department denying, suspending, or revoking the license or assessing a monetary penalty shall become final twenty days after the same has been served upon the applicant or licensee unless a hearing is requested. All hearings hereunder and judicial review of such determinations shall be in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.04 RCW.)) RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding. RCW 43.20A.215 governs notice of a civil fine and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

[ 1989 c 175 s 64; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

PDFRCW 18.51.065

Penalties—Hearing (as amended by 1989 c 372).

(1) All orders of the department denying, suspending, or revoking the license or assessing a monetary penalty shall become final twenty days after the same has been served upon the applicant or licensee unless a hearing is requested. All orders of the department imposing stop placement, temporary management, emergency closure, emergency transfer, or license suspension, shall be effective immediately upon notice. Orders of the department imposing denial of payment shall become final twenty days after the same has been served, unless a hearing is requested, except that such orders shall be effective immediately upon notice and pending any hearing when the department determines the deficiencies jeopardize the health and safety of the residents or seriously limit the nursing home's capacity to provide adequate care. All hearings hereunder and judicial review of such determinations shall be in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter ((34.04)) 34.05 RCW, except that all orders of the department imposing stop placement, temporary management, emergency closure, emergency transfer, or license suspension shall be effective pending any hearing, and except that chapter 34.05 RCW shall have no application to receivership, which is instituted by direct petition to superior court as provided for in RCW 18.51.410 through 18.51.520.

[ 1989 c 372 s 9; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 16.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 18.51.065 was amended twice during the 1989 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.